Mississippi, session 2026, SB2318.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 41-29-139.1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-29-139.1.  (1)  (a)  A person who delivers or causes the delivery of * * * fentanyl an illicit synthetic substance with knowledge of the * * * fentanyl illicit synthetic substance commits * * * the crime of fentanyl delivery resulting in death a felony when as a result of the unlawful delivery of * * * fentanyl the illicit synthetic substance in exchange for anything of value to another person, death to a person results from the proximate cause of injection, oral ingestion or inhalation of the * * * fentanyl illicit synthetic substance. (b)  Upon conviction for violating the provisions of this section, the person shall be sentenced to imprisonment no less than twenty (20) years to a term of life in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections and shall be fined not less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00). (2)  Any person, who, in good faith, without malice and in the absence of evidence of an intent to defraud, seeks medical assistance for someone experiencing * * * a fentanyl an overdose from the ingestion, injection or inhalation of an illicit synthetic substance shall not be charged or prosecuted for a violation of this section, if the evidence for the charge was gained as a result of the seeking of medical assistance. (3)  For purposes of this section, " * * *Fentanylillicit synthetic substance" means a chemically engineered substance designed to mimic the effects of an existing substance controlled under Sections 41-29-113 or 41-29-115.  The term, includes, but is not limited to, fentanyl * * * and any, fentanyl-related substances, * * * to include or fentanyl analogs * * *, as set forth in Article 3, Chapter 29 of Title 41 of the Mississippi Code of 1972. (4)  The intent of this section is to encourage the prosecution of any person who sells or otherwise profits from the sale of * * * unlawful fentanyl illicit synthetic substances, which causes the death of another person.  It is not the intent of this section to enable the prosecution of a drug user or drug addict who has shared fentanyl with a friend or associate and the friend or associate dies as a result of the injection, oral ingestion or inhalation of the shared * * * fentanyl illicit synthetic substance. (5)  The penalty provided in this section shall be in addition to any other criminal penalty provided by law. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.